Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 15. Virginia Health Care Fund.

§ 32.1-366.
Virginia Health Care Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Health Care Fund, hereafter referred to as the “Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. For purposes of the Comptroller’s preliminary and final annual reports required by §

2.2-813

, however, all deposits to and disbursements from the Fund shall be accounted for as part of the general fund of the state treasury.

All revenue received by the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of (i) §§

58.1-1001

and

58.1-1018

, (ii) Article 2.1 (§

58.1-1021.01

et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 58.1, and (iii) §

3.2-4203

shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited to the Fund. The Comptroller shall also deposit 40 percent of the Commonwealth’s allocation pursuant to the Master Settlement Agreement with tobacco product manufacturers, as defined in §

3.2-3100

, to the Fund. The Fund shall also consist of all recoveries received during a fiscal year resulting from expenditures incurred in the Medicaid program during a prior fiscal year or years to the extent that such amounts represent recoveries of state funds that would otherwise be deposited to the general fund of the state treasury.

History.

2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3; 2005, cc. 899, 901.

Cross references.

As to penalties for smoking, see §§

15.2-2824

through

15.2-2826

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Title 3.2 references were substituted for Title 3.1 references to conform to the title revision by Acts 2008, c. 860, effective October 1, 2008.

Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, cl. 10 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless the Commonwealth’s reimbursements to certain local governments for tangible personal property tax relief on qualifying vehicles, as such term is defined in §

58.1-3523

of the Code of Virginia, are set at $950 million per year for tax year 2006 and each succeeding tax year, payable over the 12-month period that corresponds with the Commonwealth’s fiscal year, beginning July 2006, under legislation passed by the 2004 Special Session I of the General Assembly that becomes law.”

Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, set the reimbursement rate at $950 million for tax years beginning in 2006.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 C 3, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

32.1-366

, Code of Virginia, the State Comptroller shall deposit 41.5 percent of the Commonwealth’s allocation of the Master Settlement Agreement with tobacco product manufacturers, as defined in §

3.2-3100

, Code of Virginia, to the Virginia Health Care Fund.”

Effective date.

This chapter became effective September 1, 2004.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 899 and 901 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted the clause (i), (ii), and (iii) designators and “§ 3.1-336.2:2” at the beginning of clause (iii), and made related changes.

§ 32.1-367.
Uses of Virginia Health Care Fund.

Moneys deposited to the Fund shall be used solely for the provision of health care services. Such moneys shall be appropriated as provided in the general appropriation act. Health care services include, but are not limited to, Medicaid payments, disease diagnosis, prevention and control, and community health services.

History.

2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, cl. 10 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless the Commonwealth’s reimbursements to certain local governments for tangible personal property tax relief on qualifying vehicles, as such term is defined in §

58.1-3523

of the Code of Virginia, are set at $950 million per year for tax year 2006 and each succeeding tax year, payable over the 12-month period that corresponds with the Commonwealth’s fiscal year, beginning July 2006, under legislation passed by the 2004 Special Session I of the General Assembly that becomes law.”

Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, set the reimbursement rate at $950 million for tax years beginning in 2006.

Effective date.

This chapter became effective September 1, 2004.